California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) A person shall not be subject to both monetary civil liability imposed under this section and monetary civil liability imposed by the superior court for the same act or failure to act. If a person who is assessed a penalty under this section fails to pay the administrative penalty, otherwise fails to comply with a restoration or cease and desist order issued by the commission in connection with the penalty action, or challenges any of these actions by the commission in a court of law, the commission may maintain an action or otherwise engage in judicial proceedings to enforce those requirements and the court may grant any relief as provided under this chapter.

(e) If a
 person fails to pay a penalty imposed by the commission pursuant to this section, the commission may record a lien on the property in the amount of the penalty assessed by the commission. This lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.

(f) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that unintentional, minor violations of this division that only cause de minimis harm will not lead to the imposition of administrative penalties if the violator has acted expeditiously to correct the violation.

(g) “Person,” for the purpose of this section, does not include a local government, a special district, or an agency thereof, when acting in a legislative or adjudicative capacity.

(h) Administrative penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be assessed if the property
 owner corrects the violation consistent with this division within 30 days of receiving written notification from the commission regarding the violation, and if the alleged violator can correct the violation without undertaking additional development that requires a permit under this division. This 30-day timeframe for corrective action does not apply to previous violations of permit conditions incurred by a property owner.

(i) Revenues derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund and expended pursuant to Section 30823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 556, Sec. 3.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30821.3.

(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this division, a person, including a landowner, who is in violation of any provision of this division other than public access, including, but not limited to, damage to archaeological and wetlands resources and damage to environmentally sensitive habitat areas, is subject to an administrative civil penalty that may be imposed by the commission in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the amount of the maximum penalty authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30820 for each violation. The administrative civil penalty may be assessed for each day the violation persists, but for no more than five years.

(b) All penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be imposed by majority vote of the
 commissioners present in a duly noticed public hearing in compliance with the requirements of Section 30810, 30811, or 30812.

(c) In determining the amount of civil liability, the commission shall take into account the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 30820.

(d) A person shall not be subject to both monetary civil liability imposed under this section and monetary civil liability imposed by the superior court for the same act or failure to act. If a person who is assessed a penalty under this section fails to pay the administrative penalty, otherwise fails to comply with a restoration or cease and desist order issued by the commission in connection with the penalty action, or challenges any of these actions by the commission in a court of law, the commission may maintain an action or otherwise engage in judicial proceedings to enforce those requirements and the court
 may grant any relief as provided under this chapter.

(e) If a person fails to pay a penalty imposed by the commission pursuant to this section, the commission may record a lien on the property in the amount of the penalty assessed by the commission. This lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.

(f) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that unintentional, minor violations of this division that only cause de minimis harm will not lead to the imposition of administrative penalties if the violator has acted expeditiously to correct the violation.

(g) “Person,” for the purpose of this section, does not include a state agency, or a local government, a special district, or an agency thereof, when acting in a legislative or adjudicative capacity.

(h) Administrative penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be assessed if the property owner corrects the violation consistent with this division within 60 days of receiving written notification from the commission regarding the violation, and if the alleged violator can correct the violation without undertaking additional development that requires a permit under this division. This 60-day timeframe for corrective action does not apply to previous violations of permit conditions incurred by a property owner.

(i) The commission staff shall prepare and present a written report to the full commission at its first public hearing after January 1, 2024, and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, every five years thereafter at the first hearing of the year, that includes all of the following related to the implementation of this section and Section 30821:

(1) The number and type of new violations investigated and identified that were reported during the previous five years.

(2) The number of violations resolved during the previous five years, including a description of those resolved without the imposition of an administrative civil penalty.

(3) The number of administrative penalties issued pursuant to this section and Section 30821 during the previous five years, the dollar amount of the penalties, and a description of the violations that resulted in the imposition of a penalty.

(4) The number of violations that were referred by the commission to the Attorney General during the previous five years.

(5) The number of violations that were
 pending at the end of the reporting period.

(6) Summaries of violations that were resolved that are both illustrative of the commission’s enforcement workload and that provided significant public benefit.

(j) The commission staff shall provide the written report described in subdivision (i) to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(k) Revenues derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund and expended pursuant to Section 30823.

(l) The commission shall provide an opportunity for a local government with a certified local coastal program to enforce violations of its building codes in compliance with that local coastal program.

(m) Judicial review of actions taken by the commission pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 30800).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 556, Sec. 4.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30821.6.

(a) Any person or governmental agency who intentionally or negligently violates any cease and desist order issued, reissued, or amended by the executive director or the commission, or any restoration order issued, reissued, or amended by the commission, a local government that is implementing a certified local coastal program, or a port governing body that is implementing a certified port master plan may be liable civilly in a sum of not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each day in which that violation persists. Any actual penalty imposed shall be reasonably proportionate to the damage suffered as a consequence of the violation.

(b) Sections 30809 and 30810 and subdivision (a) of this section do not authorize the issuance or enforcement of any cease and desist order as to any activity undertaken by a local governmental agency pursuant to a declaration of emergency by the board of supervisors of the county in which the activity is being or may be undertaken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30822.

Where a person has intentionally and knowingly violated any provision of this division or any order issued pursuant to this division, the commission may maintain an action, in addition to Section 30803 or 30805, for exemplary damages and may recover an award, the size of which is left to the discretion of the court. In exercising its discretion, the court shall consider the amount of liability necessary to deter further violations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30823.

Any funds derived under this article shall be expended for carrying out the provisions of this division, when appropriated by the Legislature. Funds so derived shall be deposited in the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund until appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1618, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30824.

In addition to any other applicable penalty, any commission member who knowingly violates Section 30324 is subject to a civil fine, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the court may award attorneys’ fees and costs to the prevailing party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 798, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Severability [30900. - 30900.]

30900.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the division which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this division are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20.4. WATERSHED, CLEAN BEACHES, AND WATER QUALITY ACT [30901. - 30950.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [30901. - 30909.]

30901.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Watershed, Clean Beaches, and Water Quality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30902.

The purpose of this division is to establish a statutory framework for funding water quality, clean beaches, and watershed protection projects from the proceeds derived from the issuance and sale of bonds and other revenue sources, and to specify how the Resources Agency and its constituent departments and boards, including the State Coastal Conservancy, and the California Environmental Protection Agency, and that agency’s constituent departments, including the State Water Resources Control Board, will coordinate and integrate programs to fund projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30903.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Clean beaches, clean water, and healthy watersheds are necessary to support both human communities and the state’s native fish and wildlife, and are part of the legacy of California. Each generation has an obligation to be good stewards of those resources in order to pass them on to their children.

(b) California’s 1,100-mile coastline is world-renowned. Coastal-related businesses provide seventeen billion dollars ($17,000,000,000) annually to the state’s economy and depend on the restoration and health maintenance of beaches.

(c) Clean water is essential to the state’s communities and economy.

(d) Watershed management is a valuable approach to meeting comprehensive resource management and water quality objectives. Watersheds provide a useful, natural unit to integrate and coordinate the many natural resource functions of state agencies.

(e) Multiple state entities within the California Environmental Protection Agency and the Resources Agency are currently administering programs that provide technical assistance or financial support for various aspects of watershed management or restoration. Hundreds of watershed partnerships exist in the state, dedicated to the restoration and management of the state’s streams, rivers, and lands, and the use of watershed management principles and practices. Coordinated watershed management implementation is crucial to addressing critical problems and the efficient use of public funds. The California Environmental Protection Agency and the Resources Agency are developing a strategic plan for fully integrated watershed investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30904.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the purpose of maintaining clean beaches, clean water, and an integrated and coordinated watershed program is to protect beaches, coastal waters, rivers, lakes, and streams from contaminants, pollution, and other environmental threats.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30905.

It is the intent of the Legislature to invest in projects that will reduce beach contamination and increase visitor days, including, but not limited to, developing the comprehensive capability to monitor and analyze water quality and pollutant transport in coastal waters. This will be demonstrated by measurable improvements in water quality on and near the state’s beaches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30906.

It is the intent of the Legislature to invest in clean water projects that will do all of the following:

(a) Assist small local communities in meeting water pollution control requirements.

(b) Improve agricultural water quality and reduce pollutants in agricultural drainage water.

(c) Implement urban stormwater treatment programs and reduce nonpoint sources of pollution.

(d) Provide comprehensive capability to monitor and analyze water quality in groundwater basins throughout the state.

(e) Improve water quality in coastal and marine waters, particularly those waters that affect marine protected areas and marine managed areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30907.

It is the intent of the Legislature to require state agencies to encourage and support both of the following:

(a) The development of coordinated and complementary strategies and solutions for watershed management across land ownership and agency jurisdictional boundaries.

(b) Coordinated program delivery from state and federal agencies to fit the needs of individual watersheds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30908.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the state should coordinate and integrate its watershed programs and implement those programs by working with diverse interests at the local level. The state’s watershed management goals should include, but need not be limited to, maintaining and restoring healthy watersheds that support thriving communities, provide clean water, and sustain natural habitats for future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30909.

It is the intent of the Legislature to invest in watershed management partnerships that use a community-based collaborative approach to meeting the state’s watershed management goals. Allocation of funding should be balanced among large and small watersheds, coastal and inland watersheds, and effluent reduction and source protection, and should be geographically balanced. Priority should be given to projects and programs that implement programs that have multiple benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [30910. - 30910.]

30910.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b)“Local public agency” means any city, county, city and county, or district.

(c) “Nonprofit organization” means any California corporation organized under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(5) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(d) “Public agency” means a city, county, city and county, district, the state or any agency or department thereof, and applicants eligible for technical assistance under Section 319 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329) or for grants under Section 320 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1330).

(e) “Regional board” means a regional water quality control board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Clean Beaches Program [30915. - 30917.]

30915.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide authorization for projects that restore and protect the water quality and environment of coastal waters, estuaries, bays, and near shore waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30916.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds provided under this chapter may be used by the board, in consultation with the State Coastal Conservancy, to award grants not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this chapter. Grants may be awarded for any of the following projects:

(1) A project designed to improve water quality at public beaches and to make improvements for the purpose of ensuring that coastal waters adjacent to public beaches meet the bacteriological standards set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 115875) of Chapter 5 of Part 10 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A project to make improvements to, or upgrades or conversions of, existing sewer collection systems and septic systems for the restoration and protection of coastal water quality.

(3) A project designed to implement stormwater and runoff pollution reduction and prevention programs, or for the implementation of best management practices, for the restoration and protection of coastal water quality.

(4) A project designed to implement or promote low-impact development for new or existing developments that will contribute to the improvement of water quality or reduce stormwater runoff.

(5) A project designed to implement a stormwater
 resource plan prepared pursuant to Part 2.3 (commencing with Section 10560) of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(b) The projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the state’s nonpoint source control program, as revised to meet the requirements of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000), Section 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Act Reauthorization Amendments of 1990, Section 319 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329), Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code, and the California Coastal Commission.

(c) The projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall demonstrate the capability of contributing to sustained, long-term water quality or environmental restoration or protection benefits for a period of 20 years, address the causes of degradation, rather than the symptoms, and be consistent with water quality and resource
 protection plans prepared, implemented, or adopted by the board, the applicable regional water quality control board, and the State Coastal Conservancy.

(d) An applicant for funds under this chapter shall be required to submit to the board a monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the nonpoint source or sources of pollution to be prevented or reduced by the project.

(2) Describes the baseline water quality or environmental quality to be addressed.

(3) Describes the manner in which the project will be effective in preventing or reducing pollution and in demonstrating the desired environmental results.

(4) Describes the monitoring program, including, but
 not limited to, the methodology, and the frequency and duration of monitoring.

(e) Upon completion of the project, a recipient of funds under this chapter shall submit a report to the board that summarizes the completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the recipient in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including a determination of the effectiveness of the project in preventing or reducing pollution, and the results of the monitoring program. The board shall make the report available to the public, watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(f) Not more than 25 percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditure.

(g) An applicant for funds under this chapter shall inform
 the board of any necessary public agency approvals, entitlements, and permits that may be necessary to implement the project. The application shall certify to the board, at the appropriate time, that those approvals, entitlements, and permits have been granted.

(h) Where recovery plans for coho salmon, steelhead trout, or other threatened or endangered aquatic species exist, projects funded under this chapter shall be consistent with those plans and, to the extent feasible, shall seek to implement actions specified in those plans.

(i) The board shall appoint a Clean Beaches Task Force comprised of individuals representing the breadth and diversity of coastal communities. All proposals for funding shall be reviewed by the task force. The task force may recommend projects to the board for funding consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

30917.

The board shall provide opportunity for public review and comment in awarding funds pursuant to this chapter, and may, in consultation with the State Coastal Conservancy, adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Marine Managed Areas Program [30920. - 30921.]

30920.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to provide authorization for projects that restore and protect the water quality and environment of marine managed areas, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 36602, including areas of special biological significance, as defined in the California Ocean Plan adopted pursuant to Section 13170.2 of the Water Code.

(b) The board shall give priority to projects that treat or otherwise remove existing waste discharges, or prevent probable waste discharges, into areas of special biological significance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30921.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for that purpose, funds may be expended by the board, in consultation with the State Coastal Conservancy, the California Coastal Commission, and, as appropriate, the Department of Fish and Game, to award grants, not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per project, to local public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The projects funded to carry out this chapter shall demonstrate the capability of contributing to sustained, long-term water quality or environmental restoration or protection benefits for a period of 20 years, address the causes of degradation rather than the symptoms, and be consistent with water quality control plans and resource protection plans prepared, implemented, or adopted by the board, the applicable regional board, the Department of Fish and Game, and the State Coastal Conservancy.

(c) An applicant for funds to carry out this chapter shall be required to submit to the board a monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the sources of pollution to be prevented or reduced by the project.

(2) Describes the baseline water quality or environmental quality to be addressed.

(3) Describes the manner in which the project will be effective in preventing or reducing pollution and in demonstrating the desired environmental results.

(4) Describes the monitoring program, including, but not limited to, the methodology, frequency, and duration of monitoring.

(d) Upon completion of the project, a recipient of funds to carry out this chapter shall submit a report to the board that summarizes the completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the recipient in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including a determination of the effectiveness of the project in preventing or reducing pollution, and the results of the monitoring program. The board shall make the report available to the public, watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(e) The board may not award more than 25 percent of a grant to carry out this chapter in advance of the expenditure of funds by a grantee.

(f) An applicant for funds to carry out this chapter shall inform the board of any necessary public agency approvals, entitlements, and permits that may be necessary to implement the project. The applicant shall certify to the board, at the appropriate time, that those approvals, entitlements, and permits have been granted.

(g) Where recovery plans for coho salmon, steelhead trout, or other threatened or endangered coastal and marine aquatic species exist, projects funded to carry out this chapter shall be consistent with those plans and, to the extent feasible, shall seek to implement actions specified in those plans.

(h) The board, in consultation with the California Coastal Commission, shall appoint a marine managed areas water quality task force comprised of individuals representing the breadth and diversity of coastal communities, interested nonprofit groups, and marine resource users. All proposals for grant funding to carry out this chapter shall be reviewed by the task force. The task force may recommend projects to the board for funding consideration.

(i) The board shall provide opportunity for public review and comment in awarding funds to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Integrated Clean Water Programs [30925. - 30950.]



  ARTICLE 1. Small Community Wastewater Grant Program [30925. - 30925.]

30925.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “small community” means a municipality with a population of 20,000 persons or less, a rural county, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality where the segment of the population is 20,000 persons or less, with a financial hardship, as determined by the board.

(b) The board may award grants under this article to assist small communities in meeting water pollution control requirements.

(c) The board may award grants under this article to projects that meet the definition of “eligible project” in Section 79120 of the Water Code.

(d) The board shall give priority to both of the following types of projects:

(1) Projects to install or replace sewer systems in communities that lack adequate sewers.

(2) Projects to assist communities with population growth pressures, to assist in the redesign and expansion of existing wastewater collection and treatment systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Urban Storm Water Grant Program [30930. - 30930.]

30930.

The board may award grants under this article to local public agencies for projects designed to implement stormwater runoff pollution reduction and prevention programs, including, but not limited to, diversion of dry weather flows to publicly owned treatment works for treatment, acquisition, and development of constructed wetlands and the implementation of approved best management practices, as required by stormwater permits issued by the state board or a regional board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nonpoint Source Pollution Control Program [30935. - 30935.]

30935.

(a) The board may award grants under this article to local public agencies and nonprofit organizations for projects that protect the beneficial uses of water throughout the state through the control of nonpoint source pollution.

(b) Except as authorized under subdivision (g), grants may be awarded only for projects that are one or more of the following:

(1) Consistent with local watershed management plans and with regional water quality control plans.

(2) Broad-based nonpoint source pollution projects, including, but not limited to, projects identified in the board’s “Initiatives in NPS Management,” dated September 1995, and in the nonpoint source technical advisory committee reports.

(3) Consistent with the “Integrated Plan for Implementation of the Watershed Management Initiative” prepared by the board and the regional boards.

(4) A project that implements watershed best management practices and measures.

(5) Consistent with the requirements of Section 6217(g) of the federal Coastal Zone Act Reauthorization Amendments of 1990 and has been identified as a needed project by the board under the 15-year implementation strategy and five-year implementation plan of the board’s nonpoint source pollution control program.

(6) A project that improves the quality of drinking water supplies and addresses contamination by pathogens, organic carbon, or salinity.

(c) Projects funded under this article shall demonstrate a capability of sustaining water quality benefits for a period of not less than 20 years. Categories of nonpoint source pollution addressed by projects may include, but need not be limited to, silviculture, agriculture, urban runoff, mining, hydromodification, grazing, onsite disposal systems, boatyards and marinas, and animal feeding operations.

(d) Projects to address nonpoint source pollution may include, but need not be limited to, wildfire management, installation of vegetative systems to filter or retard pollutant loading, incentive programs or large-scale demonstration programs to reduce commercial reliance on polluting substances or to increase acceptance of alternative methods and materials, and engineered features to minimize impacts of nonpoint source pollution.

(e) Projects funded under this article shall have defined water quality or beneficial use goals.

(f) A local public agency or nonprofit organization that has a project funded under this article shall submit to the board a monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies one or more nonpoint sources of pollution.

(2) Describes the baseline water quality of the body of water impacted.

(3) Describes the manner in which the proposed practices or measures are implemented.

(4) Determines the effectiveness of the proposed practices or measures in preventing or reducing pollution.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the board may award grants for demonstration projects that are intended to prevent, reduce, or treat nonpoint source pollution.

(h) A grant recipient shall submit a report to the board, upon completion of the project, that summarizes completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the grant recipient in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including, but not limited to, a determination of the effectiveness of the best management practices or management measures implemented as part of the project in preventing or reducing nonpoint source pollution. The board shall make the report available to watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Agricultural Water Quality Grant Program [30940. - 30940.]

30940.

(a) The board may award grants to public agencies or nonprofit organizations for the purposes of improving agricultural water quality through monitoring, demonstration projects, research, construction of agricultural drainage improvements, and for projects to reduce pollutants in agricultural drainage water through reuse, integrated management, or treatment. Grants made pursuant to this section may be used to provide matching funds for federal grant programs. The board, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture and the program advisory review board established pursuant to Section 593 of the Food and Agricultural Code, shall develop criteria for evaluating projects considered for grants under this section.

(b) (1) On or before June 30, 2005, the board, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, shall adopt guidelines for a dairy water quality improvement grant program that provides competitive grants for projects, including water quality planning and regional and on-farm projects, and projects undertaken by dairy operators, to reduce threats to, or impairment of, water quality from dairy operations.

(2) In order to be eligible for a grant pursuant to this subdivision, a dairy operator shall have completed the environmental stewardship short course of the dairy quality assurance program, unless the board finds and determines that the operator has taken other similar actions to mitigate adverse environmental effects of its dairy operation.

(c) The board shall specify a matching fund requirement, as a condition of providing grants under subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 16.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Integrated Watershed Management Programs [30945. - 30949.]

30945.

The purpose of this article is to establish a program for integrated watershed management to improve water quality, protect and restore habitat and fisheries, reduce flooding, control erosion and sedimentation, and improve local water supply reliability through better groundwater monitoring, river corridor recreation, forest land and fuel management, and hydropower management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30946.

The California Environmental Protection Agency shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Resources Agency to ensure that the program established under this chapter is coordinated with other programs administered by those agencies, including, but not limited to, the grant process set forth in Section 30947. The memorandum of understanding shall establish a stakeholder advisory process to assist in setting priorities and allocating funds. The memorandum of understanding shall be completed and executed on or before April 30, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30947.

(a) The Integrated Watershed Management Program is hereby established. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds allocated to the program may be used by the board, subject to the terms of the memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to Section 30946 to award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the development of local watershed management plans that meet the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 79078 of the Water Code, and for the implementation of watershed protection and water management projects that include one or more of the following elements:

(1) Stormwater capture and treatment.

(2) Nonpoint source pollution reduction, management, and monitoring.

(3) Groundwater recharge and management projects.

(4) Water banking, exchange, and reclamation, and improvement of water quality.

(5) Vegetation management to improve watershed efficiency, aquatic and terrestrial habitat, the creation and enhancement of wetlands, and the acquisition, protection, and restoration of open space.

(6) Planning and implementation of multipurpose flood control programs that protect property and improve water quality and stormwater capture and percolation, and protect or improve wildlife habitat.

(7) Watershed management planning and implementation.

(8) Demonstration projects to develop new water treatment distribution and nonpoint source pollution control methods.

(9) Erosion sediment control and stream enhancement projects, and permit coordination programs to facilitate watershed restoration projects that implement board approved management measures for polluted runoff.

(10) Monitoring, collection, and analysis of water quality and pollutant transport in groundwater and surface water.

(11) Native fisheries enhancement or improvement projects, and projects to restore other threatened species.

(12) Water conservation, water use efficiency, and water supply reliability.

(13) An enforceable waste discharge program, by a person who is subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of Chapter 4 of Division 7 of the Water Code and for whom the board has a name and address, that implements best management practices and includes all of the following:

(A) A clear description of how a project will achieve and maintain water quality standards.

(B) A monitoring component that assesses the effectiveness of adopted practices.

(C) Submission of a report of waste discharge to the appropriate regional water quality control board.

(b) Upon completion of the project, the grantee shall submit a report to the board that summarizes the completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the grantee in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including, but not limited to, a determination of the effectiveness of the project in preventing or reducing pollution and the results of the monitoring program. The board shall make the report available to the public, watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 493, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30948.

Consistent with Section 30947, the board shall establish an accelerated selection and contracting procedure for projects that meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The project is part of an approved watershed management plan consistent with Section 30947.

(b) The project is fully permitted and ready to be implemented.

(c) Funding for the project includes matching funds or services donated from nonstate sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)